Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Chapter 54 Energy Production Facilities
7-54-114. Director as employee prohibited.

No member of the board of directors of a not-for-profit corporation acting for the benefit or on behalf of any one (1) or more of counties, cities, towns, and local governments under this chapter may, during such member's term, be an employee of such corporation.

Acts 1988, ch. 567, § 1.